test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-asto_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - asto: # o-stems
    asto+N+Sg+Nom: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Gen: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Acc: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Ill: aaston
    asto+N+Sg+Loc: astoost
    asto+N+Sg+Com: astoin
    asto+N+Sg+Abe: astottáá
    asto+N+Ess: aston
    asto+N+Par: astod
    asto+N+Pl+Nom: astoh
    asto+N+Pl+Gen: astoi
    asto+N+Pl+Acc: astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Ill: astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Loc: astoin
    asto+N+Pl+Com: astoiguin
    asto+N+Pl+Abe: astoittáá
